WinSxS/amd64_microsoft-windows-a..ty-braille-liblouis_31bf3856ad364e35_10.0.22621.1_none_3f320d4f4bbdd98f/hyph_brl_da_dk.dic
ørø4
ørøv1er
ørøv2e1re
øse3ra2g
øs4e
øs2e1r4a
øs1ko
øsk4
ø4s3kø4
øst4
øs1tr4y4
øst4r
øv3e2r4a
øv1er
øv2e1ru
øv4s2
å4
åbe2
åb4
åb2e3re
åd1ej4
åke2r
åk4
åls1ken2
ål4
ålsk4
åls1t2
ån2d4a
ånds1k4
ån2ds
ånds3k4a
ånds1t4i
åndst2
ån4dø4
åneds3k4
ån2ed
åne2ds
ån2e1ru
ån1er
åns1t2
å2n2s
ård1ej4
årds3k4a
årds1k4
år2ds
åre2
års1k4
å2rs
års3ko.
års3kv
års1t2
ås2es2
ås4e
ås1k4a
åsk4
ås2kr2
